Indiana, session 2026, HB1253.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-10.5-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. "Family case manager"
means an employee of the department of child services who is
classified as a family case manager.
SECTION 2. IC 10-10.5-1-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.113-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) "Public safety agency" means a state or
local:
(1) law enforcement agency;
(2) fire protection agency (including a volunteer fire department);
(3) PSAP;
(4) emergency management agency; or
(5) correctional institution.
(b) The term includes the department of child services.
SECTION 3. IC 10-10.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2022,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The state of Indiana designates the following
individuals to be Indiana first responders:
(1) A law enforcement officer.
(2) A firefighter, including a volunteer firefighter.
(3) A corrections officer.
(4) A public safety telecommunicator.
(5) An emergency medical technician, emergency medical
responder, or paramedic.
(6) An individual performing emergency management services
subject to the order or control of, or under a request of, the state
or local government, including a volunteer health practitioner
registered under IC 10-14-3.5.
(7) Any individual serving in an employee or volunteer capacity
for a public safety agency, whose duties include rapid emergency
response.
(8) A county coroner or deputy county coroner.
(9) A family case manager.
SECTION 4. IC 11-8-8-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 160, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section,
"offender" means a sex offender (as defined in section 4.5 of this
chapter) and a sex or violent offender (as defined in section 5 of this
chapter).
(b) Subsection (g) (h) applies to an offender required to register
under this chapter if, due to a change in federal or state law after June
30, 2007, an individual who engaged in the same conduct as the
offender:
(1) would not be required to register under this chapter; or
(2) would be required to register under this chapter but under less
restrictive conditions than the offender is required to meet.
(c) A person to whom this section applies may petition a court to:
(1) remove the person's designation as an offender and order the
department to remove all information regarding the person from
the public portal of the sex and violent offender registry website
established under IC 36-2-13-5.5; or
(2) require the person to register under less restrictive conditions.
A court may not issue an order described by subdivision (1) or (2)
unless a petition is filed under this section.
(d) A petition under this section shall be filed in the circuit or
superior court of the county in which the offender resides. If the
offender resides in more than one (1) county, the petition shall be filed
in the circuit or superior court of the county in which the offender
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


resides the greatest time. If the offender does not reside in Indiana, the
petition shall be filed in the circuit or superior court of the county
where the offender is employed the greatest time. If the offender does
not reside or work in Indiana, but is a student in Indiana, the petition
shall be filed in the circuit or superior court of the county where the
offender is a student. If the offender is not a student in Indiana and does
not reside or work in Indiana, the petition shall be filed in the county
where the offender was most recently convicted of a crime listed in
section 5 of this chapter.
(e) After receiving a petition under this section, the court may
(1) summarily dismiss the petition. or
(2) (f) If the court does not dismiss a petition under subsection
(e), the court shall give notice to:
(A) (1) the department;
(B) (2) the attorney general;
(C) (3) the prosecuting attorney of:
(i) (A) the county where the petition was filed;
(ii) (B) the county where offender was most recently convicted
of an offense listed in section 5 of this chapter; and
(iii) (C) the county where the offender resides; and
(D) (4) the sheriff of the county where the offender resides;
and set the matter for hearing. The date set for a hearing must not be
less than sixty (60) days after the court gives notice under this
subsection.
(f) (g) If a court sets a matter for a hearing under this section, the
prosecuting attorney of the county in which the action is pending shall
appear and respond, unless the prosecuting attorney requests the
attorney general to appear and respond and the attorney general agrees
to represent the interests of the state in the matter. If the attorney
general agrees to appear, the attorney general shall give notice to:
(1) the prosecuting attorney; and
(2) the court.
(g) (h) A court may grant a petition under this section if, following
a hearing, the court makes the following findings:
(1) The law requiring the petitioner to register as an offender has
changed since the date on which the petitioner was initially
required to register.
(2) If the petitioner who was required to register as an offender
before the change in law engaged in the same conduct after the
change in law occurred, the petitioner would:
(A) not be required to register as an offender; or
(B) be required to register as an offender, but under less
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


restrictive conditions.
(3) If the petitioner seeks relief under this section because a
change in law makes a previously unavailable defense available
to the petitioner, that the petitioner has proved the defense.
The court has the discretion to deny a petition under this section, even
if the court makes the findings under this subsection.
(h) (i) The petitioner has the burden of proof in a hearing under this
section.
(i) (j) If the court grants a petition under this section, the court shall
notify:
(1) the victim of the offense, if applicable;
(2) the department of correction; and
(3) the local law enforcement authority of every county in which
the petitioner is currently required to register.
(j) (k) An offender may base a petition filed under this section on a
claim that the application or registration requirements constitute ex
post facto punishment.
(k) (l) A petition filed under this section must:
(1) be submitted under the penalties of perjury;
(2) list each of the offender's criminal convictions and state for
each conviction:
(A) the date of the judgment of conviction;
(B) the court that entered the judgment of conviction;
(C) the crime that the offender pled guilty to or was convicted
of; and
(D) whether the offender was convicted of the crime in a trial
or pled guilty to the criminal charges; and
(3) list each jurisdiction in which the offender is required to
register as a sex offender or a violent offender.
(l) (m) The attorney general may initiate an appeal from any order
granting an offender relief under this section.
SECTION 5. IC 35-31.5-2-33, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2012,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33. "Camera", for purposes of IC 35-45-4-5,
IC 35-45-4-5.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-45-4-5(a)(1).
IC 35-45-4-5.5(a).
SECTION 6. IC 35-31.5-2-231, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2012,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 231. "Peep", for purposes of IC 35-45-4-5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-45-4-5(a)(2). IC 35-45-4-5(a).
SECTION 7. IC 35-31.5-2-246, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2012,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 246. "Private area", for purposes of IC 35-45-4-5,
IC 35-45-4-5.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-45-4-5(a)(3).
IC 35-45-4-5.5(a).
SECTION 8. IC 35-38-1-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 229, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) As used in this section,
"sexually violent predator" means a person who suffers from a mental
abnormality or personality disorder that makes the individual likely to
repeatedly commit a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2). The
term includes a person convicted in another jurisdiction who is
identified as a sexually violent predator under IC 11-8-8-20. The term
does not include a person no longer considered a sexually violent
predator under subsection (g).
(b) A person who:
(1) being at least eighteen (18) years of age, commits an offense
described in:
(A) IC 35-42-4-1;
(B) IC 35-42-4-2 (before its repeal);
(C) IC 35-42-4-3 as a Class A or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
or Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(D) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(1);
(E) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(2);
(F) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(3) (before that provision was redesignated
by P.L.158-2013, SECTION 441);
(G) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(1) as a Class A or Class B felony (for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(H) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(2); or
(I) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(3) as a Class A or Class B felony (for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(2) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having a previous unrelated conviction for a sex offense for which
the person is required to register as a sex or violent offender under
IC 11-8-8;
(3) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having had a previous unrelated adjudication as a delinquent child
for an act that would be a sex offense if committed by an adult, if,
after considering expert testimony, a court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the person is likely to commit an
additional sex offense; or
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


(4) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having had a previous unrelated adjudication as a delinquent child
for an act that would be a sex offense if committed by an adult, if
the person was required to register as a sex or violent offender
under IC 11-8-8-5(b)(2);
is a sexually violent predator. Except as provided in subsection (g) or
(h), a person is a sexually violent predator by operation of law if an
offense committed by the person satisfies the conditions set forth in
subdivision (1) or (2) and the person was released from incarceration,
secure detention, probation, or parole for the offense after June 30,
1994.
(c) This section applies whenever a court sentences a person or a
juvenile court issues a dispositional decree for a sex offense (as defined
in IC 11-8-8-5.2) for which the person is required to register with the
local law enforcement authority under IC 11-8-8.
(d) At the sentencing hearing, the court shall indicate on the record
whether the person has been convicted of an offense that makes the
person a sexually violent predator under subsection (b).
(e) If a person is not a sexually violent predator under subsection
(b), the prosecuting attorney may request the court to conduct a hearing
to determine whether the person (including a child adjudicated to be a
delinquent child) is a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). If
the court grants the motion, the court shall appoint two (2)
psychologists or psychiatrists who have expertise in criminal
behavioral disorders to evaluate the person and testify at the hearing.
After conducting the hearing and considering the testimony of the two
(2) psychologists or psychiatrists, the court shall determine whether the
person is a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). A hearing
conducted under this subsection may be combined with the person's
sentencing hearing.
(f) If a person is a sexually violent predator:
(1) the person is required to register with the local law
enforcement authority as provided in IC 11-8-8; and
(2) the court shall send notice to the department of correction.
(g) This subsection does not apply to a person who has two (2) or
more unrelated convictions for an offense described in IC 11-8-8-4.5
for which the person is required to register under IC 11-8-8. A person
who is a sexually violent predator may petition the court to consider
whether the person should no longer be considered a sexually violent
predator. The person may file a petition under this subsection not
earlier than ten (10) years after:
(1) the sentencing court or juvenile court makes its determination
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


under subsection (e); or
(2) the person is released from incarceration or secure detention.
A person may file a petition under this subsection not more than one
(1) time per year. A court may dismiss a petition filed under this
subsection or conduct a hearing to determine if the person should no
longer be considered a sexually violent predator. If the court conducts
a hearing, the court shall appoint two (2) psychologists or psychiatrists
who have expertise in criminal behavioral disorders to evaluate the
person and testify at the hearing. After conducting the hearing and
considering the testimony of the two (2) psychologists or psychiatrists,
the court shall determine whether the person should no longer be
considered a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). If a court
finds that the person should no longer be considered a sexually violent
predator, the court shall send notice to the department of correction that
the person is no longer considered a sexually violent predator or an
offender against children. Notwithstanding any other law, a condition
imposed on a person due to the person's status as a sexually violent
predator, including lifetime parole or GPS monitoring, does not apply
to a person no longer considered a sexually violent predator.
(h) A person is not a sexually violent predator by operation of law
under subsection (b)(1) if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The victim was not less than twelve (12) years of age at the
time the offense was committed.
(2) The person is not more than four (4) years older than the
victim.
(3) The relationship between the person and the victim was a
dating relationship or an ongoing personal relationship. The term
"ongoing personal relationship" does not include a family
relationship.
(4) The offense committed by the person was not any of the
following:
(A) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(B) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its
repeal).
(C) An offense committed by using or threatening the use of
deadly force or while armed with a deadly weapon.
(D) An offense that results in serious bodily injury.
(E) An offense that is facilitated by furnishing the victim,
without the victim's knowledge, with a drug (as defined in
IC 16-42-19-2(1)) or a controlled substance (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-7) or knowing that the victim was furnished with
the drug or controlled substance without the victim's
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


knowledge.
(5) The person has not committed another sex offense (as defined
in IC 11-8-8-5.2) (including a delinquent act that would be a sex
offense if committed by an adult) against any other person.
(6) The person did not have a position of authority or substantial
influence over the victim.
(7) The court finds that the person should not be considered a
sexually violent predator.
(i) If the court sets a hearing on a petition filed under subsection
(g), notice shall be given in the manner required under
IC 11-8-8-22(f). A court may not issue an order under this section
to:
(1) order the department to remove all information regarding
the person from the public portal of the sex and violent
offender registry website established under IC 36-2-13-5.5; or
(2) require the person to register under less restrictive
conditions required by IC 11-8-8;
unless the petitioner has also filed a petition under IC 11-8-8-22.
SECTION 9. IC 35-42-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, and except as
provided in subsection (d), "offender against children" means a person
required to register as a sex or violent offender under IC 11-8-8 who
has been:
(1) found to be a sexually violent predator under IC 35-38-1-7.5;
or
(2) convicted of one (1) or more of the following offenses:
(A) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(B) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(C) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(D) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(E) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than
eighteen (18) years of age, and the person is not the child's
parent or guardian.
A person is an offender against children by operation of law if the
person meets the conditions described in subdivision (1) or (2) at any
time.
(b) As used in this section, "reside" means to spend more than three
(3) nights in:
(1) a residence; or
(2) if the person does not reside in a residence, a particular
location;
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


in any thirty (30) day period.
(c) An offender against children who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) resides within one thousand (1,000) feet of:
(A) school property, not including property of an institution
providing post-secondary education;
(B) a youth program center;
(C) a public park; or
(D) a day care center licensed under IC 12-17.2;
(2) establishes a residence within one (1) mile of the residence of
the victim of the offender's sex offense; or
(3) resides in a residence where a child care provider (as defined
by IC 31-33-26-1) provides child care services;
commits a sex offender residency offense, a Level 6 felony.
(d) This subsection does not apply to an offender against children
who has two (2) or more unrelated convictions for an offense described
in subsection (a). A person who is an offender against children may
petition the court to consider whether the person should no longer be
considered an offender against children. The person may file a petition
under this subsection not earlier than ten (10) years after the person is
released from incarceration or parole, whichever occurs last (or, if the
person is not incarcerated, not earlier than ten (10) years after the
person is released from probation). A person may file a petition under
this subsection not more than one (1) time per year. A court may
dismiss a petition filed under this subsection or conduct a hearing to
determine if the person should no longer be considered an offender
against children. If the court conducts a hearing, the court shall appoint
two (2) psychologists or psychiatrists who have expertise in criminal
behavioral disorders to evaluate the person and testify at the hearing.
After conducting the hearing and considering the testimony of the two
(2) psychologists or psychiatrists, the court shall determine whether the
person should no longer be considered an offender against children. If
a court finds that the person should no longer be considered an offender
against children, the court shall send notice to the department of
correction that the person is no longer considered an offender against
children.
(e) If the court sets a hearing on a petition filed under subsection
(d), notice shall be given in the manner required under
IC 11-8-8-22(f). A court may not issue an order under this section
to:
(1) order the department to remove all information regarding
the person from the public portal of the sex and violent
offender registry website established under IC 36-2-13-5.5; or
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


(2) require the person to register under less restrictive
conditions required by IC 11-8-8;
unless the petitioner has also filed a petition under IC 11-8-8-22.
SECTION 10. IC 35-42-4-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "serious sex
offender" means a person required to register as a sex offender under
IC 11-8-8 who is:
(1) found to be a sexually violent predator under IC 35-38-1-7.5;
or
(2) convicted of one (1) or more of the following offenses:
(A) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(B) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(C) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(D) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5(a) and
IC 35-42-4-5(b)).
(E) Performing sexual conduct in the presence of a minor (IC
35-42-4-5(c)).
(F) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(G) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(H) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9).
(b) A serious sex offender who knowingly or intentionally enters
school property commits unlawful entry by a serious sex offender, a
Level 6 felony.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (b) that:
(1) a religious institution or house of worship is located on the
school property; and
(2) the person:
(A) enters the school property or other entity described in
IC 35-31.5-2-285(1)(A) through IC 35-31.5-2-285(1)(D) when
classes, extracurricular activities, or any other school activities
are not being held:
(i) for the sole purpose of attending worship services or
receiving religious instruction; and
(ii) not earlier than thirty (30) minutes before the beginning
of the worship services or religious instruction; and
(B) leaves the school property not later than thirty (30)
minutes after the conclusion of the worship services or
religious instruction.
(d) A serious sex offender who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) approaches; or
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


(2) communicates with;
a child who is less than eighteen (18) years of age in a public park
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-258) commits unlawful communication
by a serious sex offender, a Level 6 felony. It is a defense to a
prosecution under this subsection that the serious sex offender is
a parent or legal guardian of the child.
SECTION 11. IC 35-45-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.79-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
As used in this section,
(1) "Camera" means a camera, a video camera, a device that
captures a digital image, or any other type of video recording
device.
(2) "peep" means
(A) any looking of a clandestine, surreptitious, prying, or
secretive nature. or
(B) using a concealed camera with the intent of capturing an
intimate image (as defined by IC 34-21.5-2-1).
(3) "Private area" means the naked or undergarment clad genitals,
pubic area, or buttocks of an individual.
(b) A person:
(1) who knowingly or intentionally:
(A) peeps; or
(B) goes upon the land of another with the intent to peep;
into an occupied dwelling of another person; or
(2) who knowingly or intentionally peeps in or into an area where
an occupant of the area reasonably can be expected to disrobe or
is actually expected to disrobe, including:
(A) restrooms;
(B) baths;
(C) showers; and
(D) dressing rooms;
without the consent of the other person, commits voyeurism, a Class B
misdemeanor.
(c) However, The offense under subsection (b) is a Level 6 felony
if
(1) it is knowingly or intentionally committed by means of a
camera; or
(2) the person who commits the offense has a prior unrelated
conviction under this section.
(d) A person who:
(1) without the consent of the individual; and
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


(2) with intent to peep at the private area of an individual;
peeps at the private area of an individual and records an image by
means of a camera commits public voyeurism, a Class A misdemeanor.
(e) The offense under subsection (d) is a Level 6 felony if the person
has a prior unrelated conviction under this section or if the person:
(1) publishes the image;
(2) makes the image available on the Internet; or
(3) transmits or disseminates the image to another person.
(f) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (d) that the
individual deliberately exposed the individual's private area.
(g) A person who, with the intent to peep, operates an unmanned
aerial vehicle in a manner that is intended to cause the unmanned aerial
vehicle to enter the space above or surrounding another person's
occupied dwelling for the purpose of capturing images, photographs,
video recordings, or audio recordings of the other person while the
other person is:
(1) within the other person's occupied dwelling; or
(2) on the land or premises:
(A) on which the other person's occupied dwelling is located;
and
(B) in a location that is not visible from an area:
(i) open to the general public; or
(ii) where a member of the general public has the right to be;
commits remote aerial voyeurism, a Class A misdemeanor.
(h) The offense under subsection (g) is a Level 6 felony if the person
has a prior unrelated conviction under this section or if the person:
(1) publishes the images, photographs, or recordings captured;
(2) makes the images, photographs, or recordings captured
available on the Internet; or
(3) transmits or disseminates the images, photographs, or
recordings captured to another person.
SECTION 12. IC 35-45-4-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Camera" means a camera, a video camera, a device that
captures a digital image, or any other type of video recording
device.
(2) "Private area" means the naked or undergarment clad
genitals, pubic area, or buttocks of an individual.
(b) A person who, without the consent of the individual, records
an image of the private area of an individual by means of a camera
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149


commits digital voyeurism, a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense under subsection (b) is a Level 6 felony if the
person has a prior unrelated conviction under this section or if the
person:
(1) publishes the image;
(2) makes the image available on the Internet; or
(3) transmits or disseminates the image to another person.
(d) A person who operates an unmanned aerial vehicle in a
manner that is intended to cause the unmanned aerial vehicle to
enter the space above or surrounding another person's occupied
dwelling for the purpose of capturing images, photographs, video
recordings, or audio recordings of the other person while the other
person is:
(1) within the other person's occupied dwelling; or
(2) on the land or premises:
(A) on which the other person's occupied dwelling is
located; and
(B) in a location that is not visible from an area:
(i) open to the general public; or
(ii) where a member of the general public has the right
to be;
commits remote aerial voyeurism, a Class A misdemeanor.
(e) The offense under subsection (d) is a Level 6 felony if the
person has a prior unrelated conviction under this section or if the
person:
(1) publishes the images, photographs, or recordings
captured;
(2) makes the images, photographs, or recordings captured
available on the Internet; or
(3) transmits or disseminates the images, photographs, or
recordings captured to another person.
2026 IN 1253—LS 6829/DI 149